Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.600.207

Extracurricular activities—Streamlining fee collection.

(1) The process for charging and collecting associated student body card fees, school-based athletic program fees, optional noncredit school club fees, and other fees from students in grades nine through twelve who are low income must be identical to the process for charging and collecting fees from other students in grades nine through twelve, except that the fee waivers described under RCW 28A.325.010 must be automatically applied where applicable.

(2) The legislature recommends, but does not require, that the requirements under subsection (1) of this section are made applicable to students in grades six through eight.

[ 2020 c 13 s 8.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2020 c 13: See note following RCW 28A.320.580.